test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-toohad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - toohâđ: # checked

    toohâđ+V+Inf: toohâđ
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: tohhuđ
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tohhuum
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tohhuuh
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tahhoo
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tahhojeen
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: tohhuuvettee
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: tohhuv
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tohhup
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tohhuuvetteđ
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tahhojeh
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tahhojim
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tahhojih
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tohhui
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: tohhuim
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: tohhuid
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: tohhuin
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tohhuim
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tohhuid
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tahhojii
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: tohhuuččim
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: tohhuuččih
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: tohhuuččij
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: tohhuuččáim
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: tohhuuččáid
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: tohhuuččáin
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: tohhuuččijm
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: tohhuuččijd
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: tohhuuččii
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: tohhuužeem
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: tohhuužeeh
##    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: tohhuš
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: tohhuužeen
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: tohhušvettee
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: tohhuužává
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: tohhuužep
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: tohhušvetteđ
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: tohhuužeh
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tohhuu
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: tohhum
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: tohhuuččii
#    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: tohhuužii
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [tahhojeijee, tahhojijjee]
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: [tohhum, toohum] #Lene added toohum
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: tohhum
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: tohhuumin
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: tohhuumist
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: tohhuumân
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: tohhuudijn
    toohâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: tohhuuhánnáá
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tovâdâm
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tovâdah
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toovâd
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tovâdeen
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: toovâdvettee
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: tovâdává
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tovâdeh
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toovâd
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tovâdim
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tovâdij
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tovâdii
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: tovâdiččim
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: tovâdičij
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: tovâdižžeem
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: tovâdiš
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toovâd
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: tovâdâm
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: tovâdižžii
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: tovâdâm
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: toovâdhánnáá
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: tovâdem
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: toovâdmân
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: toovâdmin
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: toovâdmist
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: toovâddijn
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: toovâddijnân
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: toovâddijnâd
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: toovâddijnis
    toohâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: toovâddijn
    toohâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tovâstâm
    toohâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tovâttâm
    toohâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tovâškuáđám
    toohâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: tohâliđ
    toohâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tohâlâm
    toohâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toohâl
    toohâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tohâleen
    toohâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tohâleh
    toohâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toohâl
    toohâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tohâlim
    toohâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tohâlij
    toohâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tohâlii

  Verb - luuhâđ: # checked

    luuhâđ+V+Inf: luuhâđ
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: luhhuđ
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luhhuum
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luhhuuh
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lohhoo
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: lohhojeen
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: luhhuuvettee
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: luhhuv
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luhhup
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luhhuuvetteđ
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lohhojeh
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lohhojim
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lohhojih
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luhhui
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: luhhuim
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: luhhuid
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: luhhuin
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: luhhuim
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: luhhuid
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lohhojii
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: luhhuuččim
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: luhhuuččih
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: luhhuuččij
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: luhhuuččáim
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: luhhuuččáid
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: luhhuuččáin
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: luhhuuččijm
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: luhhuuččijd
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: luhhuuččii
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: luhhuužeem
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: luhhuužeeh
#    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: luhhuš
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: luhhuužeen
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: luhhušvettee
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: luhhuužává
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: luhhuužep
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: luhhušvetteđ
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: luhhuužeh
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: luhhuu
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: luhhum
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: luhhuuččii
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: luhhuužii
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [lohhojeijee, lohhojijjee]
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: [luhhum, luuhum] #Lene added luuhum
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: luhhum
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: luhhuumin
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: luhhuumist
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: luhhuumân
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: luhhuudijn
    luuhâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: luhhuuhánnáá
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luvâdâm
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luvâdah
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luuvâd
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: luvâdeen
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: luuvâdvettee
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: luvâdává
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: luvâdeh
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: luuvâd
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luvâdim
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luvâdij
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: luvâdii
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: luvâdiččim
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: luvâdičij
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: luvâdižžeem
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: luvâdiš
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: luuvâd
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: luvâdâm
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: luvâdižžii
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: luvâdâm
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: luuvâdhánnáá
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: luvâdem
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: luuvâdmân
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: luuvâdmin
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: luuvâdmist
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: luuvâddijn
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: luuvâddijnân
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: luuvâddijnâd
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: luuvâddijnis
    luuhâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: luuvâddijn
    luuhâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luvâstâm
    luuhâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luvâttâm
    luuhâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luvâškuáđám
    luuhâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: luhâliđ
    luuhâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luhâlâm
    luuhâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luuhâl
    luuhâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: luhâleen
    luuhâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: luhâleh
    luuhâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: luuhâl
    luuhâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luhâlim
    luuhâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luhâlij
    luuhâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: luhâlii
    
  Verb - puurrâđ: # ML checked
